02_Morphology/midterm.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<v%>		! Verb
%<tv%>		! Transitive
%<perf%>	! Perfective aspect

%<o_sg1%>	! Object 1st person singular
%<o_sg2%>	! Object 2nd person singular
%<o_sg3%>	! Object 3rd person singular
%<o_pl1%>	! Object 1st person plural
%<o_pl2%>	! Object 2nd person plural
%<o_pl3%>	! Object 3rd person plural

%<s_sg1%>	! Subject 1st person singular
%<s_sg2%>	! Subject 2nd person singular
%<s_sg3%>	! Subject 3rd person singular
%<s_pl1%>	! Subject 1st person plural
%<s_pl2%>	! Subject 2nd person plural
%<s_pl3%>	! Subject 3rd person plural

LEXICON Root

V-TV ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<perf%>:x Object ;

LEXICON Verbs

tzʼät:tzʼät #; ! "to see"

LEXICON Subject

@S.S.1@:@S.S.1@nu Verbs ;
@S.S.2@:@S.S.2@a Verbs ;
@S.S.3@:@S.S.3@ru Verbs ;
@S.Pl.1@:@S.Pl.1@qa Verbs ;
@S.Pl.2@:@S.Pl.2@i Verbs ;
@S.Pl.3@:@S.Pl.3@ki Verbs ;

LEXICON Object

@O.S.1@:@O.S.1@in Subject ;
@O.S.2@:@O.S.2@at Subject ;
@O.S.3@:@O.S.3@ Subject ;
@O.Pl.1@:@O.Pl.1@oj Subject ;
@O.Pl.2@:@O.Pl.2@ix Subject ;
@O.Pl.3@:@O.Pl.3@e Subject ;
